West Virginia, session 2026, HB4348.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 57. REQUIRED COVERAGE FOR HEALTH INSURANCE. §33-57-2. Prohibition on denial of coverage, increase in premiums, or cancellation of sickness, disability, or long-term care insurance for living organ donors. (a) For purposes of this section, the term "living organ donor" means an individual who has donated all or part of an organ and is not deceased.(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of §33-1-1 et seq., an insurer subject to §33-15-1 et seq., §33-16-1 et seq., §33-24-1 et seq., §33-25-1 et seq., or §33-25A-1 et seq. of this code which issues or renews a health insurance policy on or after July 1, 2026, may not:(1) Decline or limit coverage of a person under any sickness, disability, or long-term care insurance policy solely due to the status of such person as a living organ donor;(2) Preclude an insured from donating all or part of an organ as a condition of continuing to receive a sickness, disability, or long-term care insurance policy; or(3) Otherwise discriminate in the offering, issuance, cancellation, amount of such coverage, price, or any other condition of a sickness, disability, or long-term care insurance policy for a person, based solely and without any additional actuarial risks upon the status of such person as a living organ donor.